Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.030

Creation of boundary review boards in counties with populations of two hundred ten thousand or more—Creation in other counties.

(1) There is hereby created and established in each county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or more a board to be known and designated as a "boundary review board".

(2) A boundary review board may be created and established in any other county in the following manner:

(a) The county legislative authority may, by majority vote, adopt a resolution establishing a boundary review board; or

(b) A petition seeking establishment of a boundary review board signed by qualified electors residing in the county equal in number to at least five percent of the votes cast in the county at the last county general election may be filed with the county auditor.

Upon the filing of such a petition, the county auditor shall examine the same and certify to the sufficiency of the signatures thereon. No person may withdraw his or her name from a petition after it has been filed with the auditor. Within thirty days after the filing of such petition, the county auditor shall transmit the same to the county legislative authority, together with his or her certificate of sufficiency.

After receipt of a valid petition for the establishment of a boundary review board, the county legislative authority shall submit the question of whether a boundary review board should be established to the electorate at the next primary or general election according to RCW 29A.04.321. Notice of the election shall be given as provided in RCW 29A.52.355 and shall include a clear statement of the proposal to be submitted.

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor of the establishment of the boundary review board, such board shall thereupon be deemed established.

[ 2011 c 10 s 80; 2006 c 344 s 28; 1991 c 363 s 91; 1969 ex.s. c 111 s 1; 1967 c 189 s 3.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.